Missouri, session 2026, HB2679.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 143, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto seven new sections, to
be known as sections 143.1140, 143.1141, 143.1143, 143.1144, 143.1145, 143.1146, and
143.1147, to read as follows:
143.1140. 1. This section shall be known and may be cited as the "First-Time
Business Owner Tax Deduction Act".
2. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Deduction", an amount subtracted from the taxpayer's Missouri adjusted
gross income to determine Missouri taxable income for the tax year in which such
deduction is claimed;
(2) "Eligible expenses", the same meaning as that term is defined under section
143.1143;
(3) "First-time business owner savings account", the same meaning as that term
is defined under section 143.1143;
(4) "First-time business owner savings account act", sections 143.1141 to
143.1147;
(5) "Taxpayer", any individual who is a resident of this state and subject to the
income tax imposed under this chapter, excluding withholding tax imposed under
sections 143.191 to 143.265.
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2679 2
3. For all tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2027, a taxpayer shall be
allowed a deduction equal to fifty percent of the taxpayer's contributions to a first-time
business owner savings account in the tax year of the contribution.
4. The amount of the deduction claimed shall not exceed the amount of the
taxpayer's Missouri adjusted gross income for the tax year the deduction is claimed.
5. The assets of a first-time business owner savings account and any income
therefrom shall be exempt from all taxation by the state or any of its political
subdivisions. Income earned or received as a result of assets in a first-time business
owner savings account shall not be subject to state income tax imposed under chapter
143. The exemption from taxation under this section shall apply only to assets and
income maintained, accrued, or expended under the requirements of the first-time
business owner savings account act, and no exemption shall apply to assets and income
expended for any other purposes. Annual contributions made to the savings program,
up to and including eight hundred dollars per participating taxpayer or up to and
including one thousand six hundred dollars for married individuals filing a combined
tax return, shall be subtracted from gross income to determine Missouri adjusted gross
income under section 143.121.
6. If any deductible contributions to or earnings from the program referred to in
this section are distributed and not used to pay for eligible expenses or are not held for
the minimum length of time under subsection 2 of section 143.1145, the amount so
distributed shall be added to the Missouri adjusted gross income of the participant or, if
the participant is not living, the amount shall be added to the Missouri adjusted gross
income of the participant's beneficiary.
7. The department of revenue shall promulgate all necessary rules and
regulations for the administration of this section. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that
term is defined in section 536.010, that is created under the authority delegated in this
section shall become effective only if it complies with and is subject to all of the
provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section 536.028. This section and chapter
536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with the general assembly
pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective date, or to disapprove and annul
a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking authority
and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.
8. Under section 23.253 of the Missouri sunset act:
(1) The provisions of the new program authorized under this section shall
automatically sunset on December thirty-first six years after the effective date of this
section unless reauthorized by an act of the general assembly; and

HB 2679 3
(2) This section shall terminate on September first of the calendar year
immediately following the calendar year in which the program authorized under this
section is sunset.
143.1141. Sections 143.1141 to 143.1147 shall be known and may be cited as the
"First-Time Business Owner Savings Account Act".
143.1143. As used in sections 143.1141 to 143.1147, the following terms mean:
(1) "Account holder", an individual who establishes an account with a financial
institution that is designated as a first-time business owner savings account in
accordance with section 143.1144;
(2) "Department", the department of revenue;
(3) "Eligible expenses", any business expenses that result from the start-up of a
new business or that occur during the first month of a new business including, but not
limited to, incorporation fees, legal fees, marketing expenses, purchases of equipment,
inventory, real estate, or supplies, rent, security deposits, vehicles, or wages of
employees;
(4) "Financial institution", any state bank, state trust company, savings and loan
association, federally chartered credit union doing business in this state, credit union
chartered by the state of Missouri, national bank, broker-dealer, mutual fund, insurance
company, or other similar financial entity qualified to do business in this state;
(5) "First-time business owner", an individual who:
(a) Either individually or jointly, has never owned, been a partner in, or held the
majority of shares in a sole proprietorship, partnership, corporation, or limited liability
company; and
(b) Is a member of a minority;
(6) "First-time business owner savings account" or "account", an account with a
financial institution designated as such in accordance with subsection 1 of section
143.1144;
(7) "Member of a minority", any individual who has been subjected to racial or
ethnic prejudice or cultural bias because of his or her identity as a member of a group
without regard to his or her individual qualities. Such groups shall include, but not be
limited to, groups based on race, color, religion, sex, or national origin;
(8) "Qualified beneficiary", a first-time business owner, designated by an
account holder, for whose eligible expenses the moneys in a first-time business owner
savings account are or will be used.
143.1144. 1. Beginning January 1, 2027, any individual may open an account
with a financial institution and designate the account, in its entirety, as a first-time
business owner savings account to be used to pay or reimburse a qualified beneficiary's

HB 2679 4
eligible expenses for starting a new business. An individual may be the account holder
of multiple accounts, and an individual may jointly own the account with another
person if such persons file a joint income tax return. To be eligible for the tax deduction
under section 143.1140, an account holder shall comply with the requirements of this
section.
2. An account holder shall designate, no later than April fifteenth of the year
following the tax year in which the account was established, a first-time business owner
as the qualified beneficiary of the first-time business owner savings account. The
account holder may designate himself or herself as the qualified beneficiary. The
account holder may change the designated qualified beneficiary at any time, but no
first-time business owner savings account shall have more than one qualified beneficiary
at any time. No account holder shall have multiple accounts with the same qualified
beneficiary, but an individual may be designated as the qualified beneficiary of multiple
accounts.
3. (1) The following limits apply to a first-time business owner savings account:
(a) The maximum contribution to a first-time business owner savings account is
one thousand six hundred dollars per year for an individual and three thousand two
hundred dollars per year for account holders who file a joint tax return;
(b) The maximum amount of all contributions for all tax years to a first-time
business owner savings account is twenty thousand dollars; and
(c) The maximum balance of a first-time business owner savings account is
thirty thousand dollars.
(2) If a limit in subdivision (1) of this subsection is exceeded, thereafter no
interest or other income earned on the investment of moneys in the first-time business
owner savings account shall be included in the tax exemption under section 143.1140.
(3) Moneys may remain in a first-time business owner savings account for an
unlimited duration without the interest or income being subject to recapture or penalty.
4. The account holder shall not use moneys in an account to pay expenses of
administering the account, except that a service fee may be deducted from the account
by a financial institution. The account holder shall be responsible for maintaining
documentation for the first-time business owner savings account and for eligible
expenses related to the qualified beneficiary starting a new business.
143.1145. 1. (1) For purposes of the tax benefit conferred under the first-time
business owner savings account act, the moneys in a first-time business owner savings
account may be:
(a) Used for eligible expenses related to a qualified beneficiary starting a new
business located in this state;

HB 2679 5
(b) Used for eligible expenses related to a qualified beneficiary starting a new
business located outside this state if the qualified beneficiary is active-duty military and
was stationed in Missouri for any time after the creation of the account;
(c) Transferred to another newly created first-time business owner savings
account; and
(d) Used to pay a service fee that is deducted by the financial institution.
(2) Subdivision (1) of this subsection applies whether the qualified beneficiary is
the sole owner of the new business or a joint owner with another person who does not
qualify as a qualified beneficiary.
2. Moneys withdrawn from a first-time business owner savings account shall be
subject to recapture in the tax year in which such moneys are withdrawn if:
(1) At the time of the withdrawal, it has been less than a year since the first
deposit in the first-time business owner savings account; or
(2) The moneys are used for any purpose other than those specified under
subsection 1 of this section.

The recapture shall be an amount equal to the moneys withdrawn and shall be added to
the Missouri adjusted gross income of the account holder or, if the account holder is not
living, the qualified beneficiary.
3. If any moneys are subject to recapture under subsection 2 of this section, the
account holder shall pay to the department a penalty in the same tax year as the
recapture. If the withdrawal was made in ten or fewer years after the first deposit in the
first-time business owner savings account, the penalty shall be equal to five percent of
the amount subject to recapture, and, if the withdrawal was made more than ten years
after the first deposit in the account, the penalty shall be equal to ten percent of the
amount subject to recapture. These penalties shall not apply if:
(1) The withdrawn moneys are used for eligible expenses related to a qualified
beneficiary starting a new business outside of the state; or
(2) The withdrawn moneys are from a first-time business owner savings account
for which the qualified beneficiary died and the account holder does not designate a new
qualified beneficiary during the same tax year.
4. If the account holder dies or, if the first-time business owner savings account is
jointly owned, the account holders die and the account does not have a surviving
transfer-on-death beneficiary, all of the moneys in the account that were used for a tax
deduction under section 143.1140 shall be subject to recapture in the tax year of the
death or deaths, but no penalty shall be due to the department.

HB 2679 6
143.1146. 1. The department shall establish forms for an account holder to
annually report information about a first-time business owner savings account
including, but not limited to, how the moneys withdrawn from the fund are used, and
shall identify any supporting documentation that is required to be maintained. To be
eligible for the tax deduction under section 143.1140, an account holder shall annually
file with the account holder's state income tax return all forms required by the
department under this section, any Internal Revenue Service Form 1099 Series forms
for the account issued by the financial institution, and any other supporting
documentation the department requires.
2. The department may promulgate rules and regulations necessary to
administer the provisions of the first-time business owner savings account act. Any
rule or portion of a rule, as that term is defined in section 536.010, that is created under
the authority delegated in this section shall become effective only if it complies with and
is subject to all of the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section 536.028. This
section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with the
general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective date, or to
disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of
rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28, 2026, shall be
invalid and void.
143.1147. 1. No financial institution shall be required to:
(1) Designate an account as a first-time business owner savings account or
designate the beneficiaries of an account in the financial institution's account contracts
or systems or in any other way;
(2) Track the use of moneys withdrawn from a first-time business owner savings
account; or
(3) Report any information to the department or any other governmental agency
that is not otherwise required by law.
2. No financial institution shall be responsible or liable for:
(1) Determining or ensuring that an account holder is eligible for a tax deduction
under section 143.1140;
(2) Determining or ensuring that moneys in the account are used for eligible
expenses; or
(3) Reporting or remitting taxes or penalties related to use of moneys in a first-
time business owner savings account.

HB 2679 7
3. In implementing section 143.1140 and sections 143.1141 to 143.1147, the
department shall not establish any administrative, reporting, or other requirements on
financial institutions that are outside the scope of normal account procedures.
✔